District of Columbia statutes.
4-1361

Database.

The District of Columbia Child and Family Services Agency (referred to as “CFSA”) shall maintain an accurate database listing and tracking any child found by the Family Division of the District of Columbia Superior Court to be abused or neglected and who is in the custody of the District of Columbia, including any child with the goal of adoption or legally free for adoption.

History

Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-146, Pub. L. 105-277, § 157(b)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2141.

Short Title

District of Columbia Adoption Improvement Act of 1998: Section 157(a) of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-146, provided that the subchapter may be cited as the “District of Columbia Adoption Improvement Act of 1998.”